InpV.lexc
! This is a tranducer for verbs in Iñapari

Multichar_Symbols
+1sg.subj +2sg.subj +3sg.subj +1sg.obj +2sg.obj +3sg.obj.m +3sg.obj.f +def +indef +fut +nfut +tv +act.iv +inact.iv +stat.iv

LEXICON Root
-ni'a V ;
-'ayi V ;
-'unu'a V ;
-apɨ́ V ;
-ata V ;
-eta V ;
-ɨtahɨ V ;
-yuruã V ;
-ya'ata V ;

LEXICON V 
{V}: V-tam;

LEXICON V-tam
-def.nfut:ma Person ; 
-indef.nfut: Person ;
-def.fut:he Person ;

LEXICON Person
-1sg.obj:no # ;
-2sg.obj:pi # ; 
-3sg.obj.m:ri # ;
-3sg.obj.f:ru # ;

!The hyphen on the root will be there until I figure out how to do prefixes
!I also need to learn how to do optionality. The Bare verb stem without affixes
!is meaningful. 
